Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-1602] Center for labor education and
research; functions and programs. (a) In consultation with the labor
education advisory council, the center for labor education and research shall:

(1) Coordinate, arrange for, or conduct evaluation of
existing center programs of instruction for refinement, develop new courses of
instruction, and plan their implementation on a continuing basis;

(2) Coordinate, arrange for, or conduct instructional
programs, including classes, courses, workshops, seminars, and research studies
or projects;

(3) Coordinate, arrange for, or provide technical
assistance to trade unions to improve or implement labor education programs
within their organizations;

(4) Prepare and disseminate educational information
and publications on various subjects of concern and interest to workers and
their organizations;

(5) Develop or acquire the means necessary to offer
credit and noncredit labor studies programs via distance education throughout
the State;

(6) Develop or acquire and promote the dissemination
of labor-related information and programs through the various public media
(such as radio, television, newspapers, public and private organizations, and
clubs); and

(7) Coordinate, arrange for, or conduct credit and
noncredit teacher preparation classes to enable relevant and reliable
department of education instruction in labor-related educational courses,
programs, and activities.

(b) Notwithstanding chapters 42F, 103, and
103D, the director of the center for labor education and research may limit the
center's contracts for any publication and stationery work that may be
necessary to accomplish the aims described in subsection (a) to contractors
whose employees are represented by a representative duly elected under
applicable federal or state labor laws for collective bargaining purposes. [L
2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next